Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 5. Sexual Assault Nurse Examiners

§ 5431.
Definition; certification.

As used in this subchapter, “SANE” means a sexual assault nurse examiner.

A person licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 28 (nursing) may obtain a specialized certification from the SANE Program as a sexual assault nurse examiner if he or she demonstrates compliance with the requirements for specialized certification as established by the SANE Board.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 38, § 12, eff. May 28, 2015; amended 2017, No. 68, § 1.

§ 5432.
SANE Board.

The SANE Board is created for the purpose of advising the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiners Program.

The SANE Board shall be composed of the following members:

the Executive Director of the Vermont State Nurses Association or designee;

the President of the Vermont Association of Hospitals and Health Systems;

the Director of the Vermont Forensic Laboratory or designee;

the Director of the Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence or designee;

an attorney with experience prosecuting sexual assault crimes, appointed by the Attorney General;

the Executive Director of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services or designee;

a law enforcement officer assigned to one of Vermont’s special units of investigation, appointed by the Commissioner of Public Safety;

a law enforcement officer employed by a municipal police department, appointed by the Executive Director of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council;

three sexual assault nurse examiners, appointed by the Attorney General;

a health care provider as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9402 whose practice includes the care of victims of sexual assault, appointed by the Commissioner of Health;

a pediatrician whose practice includes the care of victims of sexual assault, appointed by the Vermont Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics;

the Coordinator of the Vermont Victim Assistance Program or designee;

the President of the Vermont Alliance of Child Advocacy Centers or designee;

the Chair of the Vermont State Board of Nursing or designee;

the Commissioner for Children and Families or designee; and

the Commissioner of Health or designee.

The SANE Board shall advise the SANE Program on the following:

statewide program priorities;

training and educational requirements;

a standardized sexual assault protocol and kit to be used by all physicians and hospitals in this State when providing forensic examinations of victims of alleged sexual offenses; and

statewide policy development related to sexual assault nurse examiner programs.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 38, § 12, eff. May 28, 2015; amended 2017, No. 68, § 1.

§ 5433.
SANE Program Clinical Coordinator.

A clinical coordinator position shall be funded by either the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services or through other identified State funding options for the purpose of staffing the SANE Program. The position shall be contracted through the Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence. The Clinical Coordinator shall consult with the SANE Board in performing the following duties:

overseeing the recruitment and retention of SANEs in the State of Vermont;

administering a statewide educational program, including:

the initial SANE certification training;

ongoing training to ensure currency of practice for SANEs; and

advanced training programs as needed;

providing consultation, technical assistance, and training to SANEs and acute care hospitals regarding the standards of care for sexual assault patients;

providing training and outreach to criminal justice and community-based agencies as needed;

coordinating and managing a system for ensuring best practices; and

granting certifications, pursuant to section 5431 of this title, to candidates who demonstrate compliance with the requirements for specialized certification as established by the SANE Board.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 38, § 12, eff. May 28, 2015; amended 2017, No. 68, § 1.

§ 5434.
Repealed. 2017, No. 68, § 1.

§ 5435.
Access to a sexual assault nurse examiner.

On or before September 1, 2017, the Vermont Association of Hospitals and Health Systems (VAHHS) and the Vermont SANE Program shall enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) to ensure improved access to sexual assault nurse examiners (SANE) for victims of sexual assault in underserved regions. Improved access may include all acute care hospitals to provide patients with care from a paid employee who is also a certified sexual assault nurse examiner or access to a shared regional staffing pool that includes certified sexual assault nurse examiners.

The Vermont SANE Program shall develop and offer an annual training regarding standards of care and forensic evidence collection to emergency department appropriate health care providers at acute care hospitals in Vermont. Personnel who are certified sexual assault nurse examiners shall not be subject to this subsection.

On or before January 1, 2018, the SANE Program shall report to the General Assembly on training participation rates pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 68, § 1.